Utah statutes.
59-10-538.   Interest on overpayments.

(1)  Interest shall be allowed and paid upon any overpayment in respect of any tax imposed by this chapter, at the rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402.

(2)  For purposes of this section, if any overpayment of tax imposed by this chapter results from a carryback of a net operating loss, such overpayment shall be deemed not to have been made prior to the close of the taxable year of the net operating loss which results in such carryback.

